Virginia statutes. Constitution of Virginia [1971]
Article VI. Judiciary.

§ 1. Judicial power; jurisdiction.

The judicial power of the Commonwealth shall be vested in a Supreme Court and in such other courts of original or appellate jurisdiction subordinate to the Supreme Court as the General Assembly may from time to time establish. Trial courts of general jurisdiction, appellate courts, and such other courts as shall be so designated by the General Assembly shall be known as courts of record.

The Supreme Court shall, by virtue of this Constitution, have original jurisdiction in cases of habeas corpus, mandamus, and prohibition; to consider claims of actual innocence presented by convicted felons in such cases and in such manner as may be provided by the General Assembly; in matters of judicial censure, retirement, and removal under Section 10 of this Article; and to answer questions of state law certified by a court of the United States or the highest appellate court of any other state. All other jurisdiction of the Supreme Court shall be appellate. Subject to such reasonable rules as may be prescribed as to the course of appeals and other procedural matters, the Supreme Court shall, by virtue of this Constitution, have appellate jurisdiction in cases involving the constitutionality of a law under this Constitution or the Constitution of the United States and in cases involving the life or liberty of any person.

The General Assembly may allow the Commonwealth the right to appeal in all cases, including those involving the life or liberty of a person, provided such appeal would not otherwise violate this Constitution or the Constitution of the United States.

Subject to the foregoing limitations, the General Assembly shall have the power to determine the original and appellate jurisdiction of the courts of the Commonwealth.

Cross references.

For general statutory provisions relating to the Supreme Court, its composition, jurisdiction, etc., see §

17.1-300

et seq.

For statutes and rule concerning jurisdiction of writs of mandamus, prohibition and habeas corpus, see §§

17.1-309

,

17.1-310

and Virginia Supreme Court Rule 5:7.

For general statutory provisions relating to circuit courts, see §

17.1-500

et seq.

As to the jurisdiction of the Supreme Court over the Judicial Inquiry and Review Commission, see §

17.1-906

.

As to appeals by the Commonwealth, see also §

19.2-398

.

Amendment ratified Nov. 5, 2002. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 2001 Session (Acts 2001, c. 787) and 2002 Session (Acts 2002, cc. 603 and 824) and ratified by the people at the general election held Nov. 5, 2002. The amendment, effective Nov. 15, 2002, inserted “to consider claims of actual innocence presented by convicted felons in such cases and in such manner as may be provided by the General Assembly” following “original jurisdiction in cases of habeas corpus, mandamus, and prohibition” near the beginning of the second paragraph of this section.

Amendment ratified Nov. 5, 1996. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1995 Regular Session (Acts 1995, c. 709) and was referred to the 1996 Session. It was again agreed to at that Session (Acts 1996, cc. 40 and 911) and submitted to the people November 5, 1996, when it was ratified. The amendment, effective January 1, 1997, added the next-to-the-last paragraph and deleted the former third paragraph which read: “No appeal shall be allowed to the Commonwealth in a case involving the life or liberty of a person, except that an appeal by the Commonwealth may be allowed in any case involving the violation of a law relating to the State revenue. The General Assembly may also allow the Commonwealth a right of appeal in felony cases, before a jury is impaneled and sworn if tried by jury or, in cases tried without a jury, before the court begins to hear or receive evidence or the first witness is sworn, whichever occurs first, from (1) an order of a circuit court dismissing a warrant, information or indictment or any count or charge thereof on the grounds that a statute upon which it was based is unconstitutional and (2) an order of a circuit court proscribing the use of certain evidence at trial on the grounds such evidence was obtained in violation of the provisions of the Fourth, Fifth or Sixth Amendments to the Constitution of the United States or Article I, Sections 8, 10 or 11 of this Constitution proscribing illegal searches and seizures and protecting rights against self-incrimination, provided the Commonwealth certifies the evidence is essential to the prosecution.”

Amendments ratified Nov. 4, 1986. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1985 Session (Acts 1985, c. 621) and again agreed to at the 1986 Session (Acts 1986, cc. 413, 431, 645, and 648) and was ratified by the people at the general election held Nov. 4, 1986. The amendment added the last sentence of the third paragraph. An identical amendment, which was also proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1985 Session (Acts 1985, c. 240), was repealed by Acts 1986, c. 413, cl. 2 and c. 431, cl. 2.

An amendment was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1985 Session (Acts 1985, c. 620), and again agreed to at the 1986 Session (Acts 1986, cc. 250, 646) and was ratified by the people at the general election held Nov. 4, 1986. The amendment deleted “and” preceding “in matters of” near the middle of the first sentence of the second paragraph and added the language “and to answer questions of state law certified by a court of the United States or the highest appellate court of any other state” to the end of that sentence.

Proposed amendment not agreed to by General Assembly. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1983 Session (Acts 1983, c. 626), and referred to the 1984 Session. At the 1984 Session the General Assembly did not again agree to the amendment.

Law Review.

For article, “Appellate Justice: A Crisis in Virginia?”, see 57 Va. L. Rev. 3 (1971).

For discussion of the constitutionality of medical malpractice review panels, see 34 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1179 (1977).

For comment, “Prohibition: The Elusive and Misunderstood Writ,” see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 693 (1982).

For article on state constitutional law processes, see 24 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 169 (1983).

For article, “Civil Rights and ‘Personal Injuries’: Virginia’s Statute of Limitations for Section 1983 Suits,” see 26 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 199 (1985).

For note, “Double Jeopardy and the Commonwealth’s Right to Writs of Error in Criminal Cases,” see 20 U. Rich. L. Rev. 629 (1986).

For note, “Commonwealth Right of Appeal in Criminal Proceedings,” see 43 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 295 (1986).

For a comment, “Slowing Union Corruption:
Reforming the Landrum-Griffin Act to Better Combat Union Embezzlement,” see 8 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 527 (2000).

For
comment, “Guarding the Guardians: Judge’s Rights and Virginia’s Judicial Inquiry and Review Commission,” see 43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 473 (2008).

For annual survey article, “Civil Practice and Procedure,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 269 (2009).

For annual survey article, see “Family Law,” 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 135 (2013).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
1A M.J. Administrative Law, § 19;
1B M.J. Appeal and Error, §§ 16, 22, 47, 57, 79, 83, 357;
2C M.J. Autrefois, Acquit and Convict, §§ 6, 10;
4C M.J. Constitutional Law, §§ 25, 27;
5A M.J. Courts, §§ 2, 3, 34, 36;
5A M.J. Creditors’ Suits, § 15;
6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony, § 49;
8A M.J. Executors & Administrators, § 256;
8B M.J. Forcible Entry and Detainer, § 28;
9A M.J. Habeas Corpus, § 18;
11B M.J. Jurisdiction, § 20;
12B M.J. Mandamus, § 24;
15 M.J. Prohibition, § 3.

§ 2. Supreme Court.

The Supreme Court shall consist of seven justices. The General Assembly may, if three-fifths of the elected membership of each house so vote at two successive regular sessions, increase or decrease the number of justices of the Court, provided that the Court shall consist of no fewer than seven and no more than eleven justices. The Court may sit and render final judgment en banc or in divisions as may be prescribed by law. No decision shall become the judgment of the Court, however, except on the concurrence of at least three justices, and no law shall be declared unconstitutional under either this Constitution or the Constitution of the United States except on the concurrence of at least a majority of all justices of the Supreme Court.

Cross references.

As to number of justices on Court and when Court sits en banc and in divisions, see §§

17.1-300

,

17.1-308

.

Law Review.

For note discussing the Virginia Judicial Council’s intermediate appellate court proposal, see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 209 (1982).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
1B M.J. Appeal and Error, § 311;
4C M.J. Constitutional Law, § 60;
11A M.J. Judges, § 3.

§ 3. Selection of Chief Justice.

The Chief Justice shall be selected from among the justices in a manner provided by law.

§ 4. Administration of the judicial system.

The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall be the administrative head of the judicial system. He may temporarily assign any judge of a court of record to any other court of record except the Supreme Court and may assign a retired judge of a court of record, with his consent, to any court of record except the Supreme Court. The General Assembly may adopt such additional measures as it deems desirable for the improvement of the administration of justice by the courts and for the expedition of judicial business.

Cross references.

As to clerk of the Supreme Court, see §§

17.1-200

,

17.1-325

.

As to Executive Secretary to the Court, see §§

17.1-314

,

17.1-315

.

As to the reporter of the Court, see §§

17.1-321

to

17.1-323

.

As to the State Law Library, see §§

42.1-60

through

42.1-64

.

§ 5. Rules of practice and procedure.

The Supreme Court shall have the authority to make rules governing the course of appeals and the practice and procedures to be used in the courts of the Commonwealth, but such rules shall not be in conflict with the general law as the same shall, from time to time, be established by the General Assembly.

Cross references.

For statutes relating to rule-making power on Supreme Court, see §§

8.01-3

,

12.1-40

,

54.1-3909

through

54.1-3913

.

For text of rules of court, see Volume 11, Rules of the Supreme Court of Virginia.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
4C M.J. Constitutional Law, § 51;
5B M.J. Criminal Procedure, § 2;
7B M.J. Evidence, § 244;
11A M.J. Judgments & Decrees, § 119.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Applicability of rules. —

Denial of a motion to vacate an arbitration award was appropriate because the application to vacate the arbitration award was not made within the statutorily required ninety days after delivery of a copy of the award to the applicant. The three-day mailing provision permitted by a court rule was not applicable to make the filing timely because the rule could not trump a statute and there was no delivery of the arbitration award by mail. Priority Imps. Battlefield, Inc. v. Reese, 91 Va. Cir. 63, 2015 Va. Cir. LEXIS 132 (Chesapeake July 28, 2015).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Broad authority to make rules governing appeals. —

No constitutional violation occurs where the justices of the Supreme Court of Virginia decline to sign an order or to identify themselves as members of the panel that ruled on a particular matter before the Court. See opinion of Attorney General to the Honorable James M. Shuler, Member, House of Delegates, 11-010, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 12 (2/18/11).

The Court’s procedures allowing routine orders to be endorsed by the Clerk’s office and permitting the identities of panel members to remain undisclosed pose no constitutional problems. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable James M. Shuler, Member, House of Delegates, 11-010, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 12 (2/18/11).

Forfeiture of license. —

Suspension of a law license for failure to pay Virginia State Bar annual fees within 60 days of notice of delinquency under the Rules of the Supreme Court of Virginia does not conflict with the penalty of license forfeiture imposed by the General Assembly in §

54.1-3914

for nonpayment of fees for two successive years. See opinion of Attorney General to Honorable Debra H. Rodman, Member, Virginia House of Delegates, 19-030,
(11/8/19).

§ 6. Opinions and judgments of the Supreme Court.

When a judgment or decree is reversed, modified, or affirmed by the Supreme Court, or when original cases are resolved on their merits, the reasons for the Court’s action shall be stated in writing and preserved with the record of the case. The Court may, but need not, remand a case for a new trial. In any civil case, it may enter final judgment, except that the award in a suit or action for unliquidated damages shall not be increased or diminished.

Cross references.

For statutory provision relating to decisions of the appellate court, see §

8.01-681

.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
1B M.J. Appeal and Error, §§ 311, 319, 323, 328, 337, 338;
5A M.J. Courts, § 19;
5B M.J. Criminal Procedure, §§ 53, 69;
13B M.J. New Trials, § 52.

§ 7. Selection and qualification of judges.

The justices of the Supreme Court shall be chosen by the vote of a majority of the members elected to each house of the General Assembly for terms of twelve years. The judges of all other courts of record shall be chosen by the vote of a majority of the members elected to each house of the General Assembly for terms of eight years. During any vacancy which may exist while the General Assembly is not in session, the Governor may appoint a successor to serve until thirty days after the commencement of the next session of the General Assembly. Upon election by the General Assembly, a new justice or judge shall begin service of a full term.

All justices of the Supreme Court and all judges of other courts of record shall be residents of the Commonwealth and shall, at least five years prior to their appointment or election, have been admitted to the bar of the Commonwealth. Each judge of a trial court of record shall during his term of office reside within the jurisdiction of one of the courts to which he was appointed or elected; provided, however, that where the boundary of such jurisdiction is changed by annexation or otherwise, no judge thereof shall thereby become disqualified from office or ineligible for reelection if, except for such annexation or change, he would otherwise be qualified.

Cross references.

As to statutory residence requirements of judges of circuit courts, see §

17.1-103

.

As to filling vacancies and electing a judge of a new circuit, see §§

17.1-509

to

17.1-512

.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on practice and pleading for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1799 (1975).

For an article, “Racial Diversity on the Bench:
Beyond Role Models and Public Confidence,” see 57 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 405 (2000).

For essay, “Reconsidering Virginia Judicial Selection,” see 43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 37 (2008).

For article, “Friction By Design: The Necessary Contest of State Judicial Power and Legislative Policymaking,” see 43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 571 (2009).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
11A M.J. Judges, §§ 2-5.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Circuit court discretion. —

Circuit court has the discretion, by precedent, statute and its inherent constitutional authority to address the applicable penalty range to the jury panel in voir dire to ensure jurors stand indifferent in the cause; the discretion is not circumscribed except by the abuse of discretion standard, and in those areas where voir dire by the parties is not explicitly delimited by precedent, the circuit court retains wide latitude to act discretionarily in a manner that ensures justice. Commonwealth v. Barela, 96 Va. Cir. 404, 2017 Va. Cir. LEXIS 177 (Fairfax County Sept. 28, 2017).

§ 8. Additional judicial personnel.

The General Assembly may provide for additional judicial personnel, such as judges of courts not of record and magistrates or justices of the peace, and may prescribe their jurisdiction and provide the manner in which they shall be selected and the terms for which they shall serve.

The General Assembly may confer upon the clerks of the several courts having probate jurisdiction, jurisdiction of the probate of wills and of the appointment and qualification of guardians, personal representatives, curators, appraisers, and committees of persons adjudged insane or convicted of felony, and in the matter of the substitution of trustees.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
3C M.J. Clerks of Court, § 5;
11B M.J. Justices and Magistrates, § 31.

§ 9. Commission; compensation; retirement.

All justices of the Supreme Court and all judges of other courts of record shall be commissioned by the Governor. They shall receive such salaries and allowances as shall be prescribed by the General Assembly, which shall be apportioned between the Commonwealth and its cities and counties in the manner provided by law. Unless expressly prohibited or limited by the General Assembly, cities and counties shall be permitted to supplement from local funds the salaries of any judges serving within their geographical boundaries. The salary of any justice or judge shall not be diminished during his term of office.

The General Assembly may enact such laws as it deems necessary for the retirement of justices and judges, with such conditions, compensation, and duties as it may prescribe. The General Assembly may also provide for the mandatory retirement of justices and judges after they reach a prescribed age, beyond which they shall not serve, regardless of the term to which elected or appointed.

Cross references.

As to filling vacancy in office of judge, see §

17.1-509

.

As to salaries of judges of circuit courts, see §§

17.1-523

.

As to retirement of judges, see §§

51.1-300

through

51.1-309

.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
11A M.J. Judges, § 10;
17 M.J. State, § 9.

§ 10. Disabled and unfit judges.

The General Assembly shall create a Judicial Inquiry and Review Commission consisting of members of the judiciary, the bar, and the public and vested with the power to investigate charges which would be the basis for retirement, censure, or removal of a judge. The Commission shall be authorized to conduct hearings and to subpoena witnesses and documents. Proceedings and documents before the Commission may be confidential as provided by the General Assembly in general law.

If the Commission finds the charges to be well-founded, it may file a formal complaint before the Supreme Court.

Upon the filing of a complaint, the Supreme Court shall conduct a hearing in open court and, upon a finding of disability which is or is likely to be permanent and which seriously interferes with the performance by the judge of his duties, shall retire the judge from office. A judge retired under this authority shall be considered for the purpose of retirement benefits to have retired voluntarily.

If the Supreme Court after the hearing on the complaint finds that the judge has engaged in misconduct while in office, or that he has persistently failed to perform the duties of his office, or that he has engaged in conduct prejudicial to the proper administration of justice, it shall censure him or shall remove him from office. A judge removed under this authority shall not be entitled to retirement benefits, but only to the return of contributions made by him, together with any income accrued thereon.

This section shall apply to justices of the Supreme Court, to judges of other courts of record, and to members of the State Corporation Commission. The General Assembly also may provide by general law for the retirement, censure, or removal of judges of any court not of record, or other personnel exercising judicial functions.

Cross references.

As to impeachment, etc., of judges, see Va. Const., Art. IV, § 17.

As to the Judicial Inquiry and Review Commission, generally, see §

17.1-900

.

As to the powers and duties of the Judicial Inquiry and Review Commission, see §

17.1-902

.

As to the officers and employees of the Judicial Inquiry and Review Commission, see §

17.1-903

.

As to the jurisdiction of the Supreme Court over the Judicial Inquiry and Review Commission, see §

17.1-906

.

Amendment ratified November 3, 1998. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1997 Regular Session (Acts 1997, cc. 768 and 772) and was referred to the 1998 Session. It was again agreed to at that session (Acts 1998, cc. 730 and 770) and submitted to the people November 3, 1998, when it was ratified. The amendment, effective January 1, 1999, in the first paragraph, in the third sentence, inserted “and documents” following “Proceedings” and substituted “Commission may be confidential as provided by the General Assembly in general law” for “Commission shall be confidential.”

Law Review.

For proposal for the removal or retirement of unfit judges, see 54 Va. L. Rev. 554 (1968).

For survey of the Virginia law on administrative law for the year 2007-2008, see
43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 73 (2008).

For
comment, “Guarding the Guardians: Judge’s Rights and Virginia’s Judicial Inquiry and Review Commission,” see 43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 473 (2008).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
11A M.J. Judges, § 26.

§ 11. Incompatible activities.

No justice or judge of a court of record shall, during his continuance in office, engage in the practice of law within or without the Commonwealth, or seek or accept any non-judicial elective office, or hold any other office of public trust, or engage in any other incompatible activity.

Cross references.

As to limitation upon judge being a member of the General Assembly, see Va. Const., Art. IV, § 4.

As to justices and judges not being permitted to practice law or hold other office, see §

17.1-102

.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
11A M.J. Judges, § 6.

§ 12. Limitation; judicial appointment.

No judge shall be granted the power to make any appointment of any local governmental official elected by the voters except to fill a vacancy in office pending the next ensuing general election or, if the vacancy occurs within one hundred twenty days prior to such election, pending the second ensuing general election, unless such election falls within sixty days of the end of the term of the office to be filled.

The YYYY amendments.

Amendment ratified November 2, 1976. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1975 Session (Acts 1975, c. 653), and referred to the 1976 Session. It was again agreed to at that session (Acts 1976, cc. 751, 782) and submitted to the people Nov. 2, 1976, when it was ratified. The amendment added “unless such election falls within sixty days of the end of the term of the office to be filled” at the end of the section.